District of Columbia statutes.
31-101

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Associate Commissioner for Securities and Banking” means the Associate Commissioner of the Securities and Banking Bureau.

(2)

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking, who shall be the chief executive officer of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

(3)

“Department” means the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

(4)

“Deputy Commissioner” means the Deputy Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

(5)

“District of Columbia Banking Code” means the statutory provisions concerning banking and financial institutions codified in Title 26, laws administered by the Commissioner, and rules and regulations promulgated under those statutory provisions and laws.

(6)

“Insurance Bureau” means the office overseeing the regulation of insurance, insurers, and health maintenance organizations.

(7)

“Securities and Banking Bureau” means the office administering the District of Columbia Banking Code and overseeing the regulation of securities.

May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 2, 44 DCR 1730
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 3(a), 51 DCR 2817
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 98, 52 DCR 2638
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2112(a), 57 DCR 6242
1981 Ed., § 35-121.
D.C. Law 15-166 redesignated par. (1) as paragraph (1B); in the redesignated par. (1B), substituted “Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “Commissioner of Insurance and Securities”; rewrote par. (1); added par. (1A); and in par. (2), substituted “Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation”. Prior to amendment, par. (1) had read as follows: “(1) ‘Commissioner’ means the Commissioner of Insurance and Securities, who shall be the chief executive officer of the Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation.”
D.C. Law 15-354 validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 18-223 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2112(a) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
Short title: Section 2111 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle K of title II of the act may be cited as the “Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking Reorganization Amendment Act of 2010”.